Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1550
Litter prone activities and areas; litter receptacles; required.

Litter prone activities and areas shall be required to have appropriate litter receptacles meeting minimum standards established by the department. The council shall, by regulation, determine what are litter prone activities and areas.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 17.
September 30, 2025